Louisiana, session 2026, HB837.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 2315.14 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2315.14. Liability for damages; unauthorized alien; exemplary damages;
employer
A. As used in this Article, "unauthorized alien" means a person who is
unlawfully present in the United States according to the federal Immigration and
Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. 1101 et seq.
B. In addition to general and special damages, exemplary damages may be
awarded to an injured party if an unauthorized alien was proven to cause the injury.
C. The provisions of this Article apply to an unauthorized alien and the
unauthorized alien's employer and statutory employer.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1259 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 837